Illinois, session 104th, SB2298.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Procurement Code is amended by 5changing Section 50-35 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 500/50-35)7    Sec. 50-35. Financial disclosure and potential conflicts 8of interest. 9    (a) All bids and offers from responsive bidders, offerors, 10vendors, or contractors with an annual value that exceeds the 11small purchase threshold established under subsection (a) of 12Section 20-20 of this Code, and all submissions to a vendor 13portal, shall be accompanied by disclosure of the financial 14interests of the bidder, offeror, potential contractor, or 15contractor and each subcontractor to be used. In addition, all 16subcontracts identified as provided by Section 20-120 of this 17Code with an annual value that exceeds the small purchase 18threshold established under subsection (a) of Section 20-20 of 19this Code shall be accompanied by disclosure of the financial 20interests of each subcontractor. The financial disclosure of 21each successful bidder, offeror, potential contractor, or 22contractor and its subcontractors shall be incorporated as a 23material term of the contract and shall become part of the   SB2298- 2 -LRB104 10185 HLH 20257 b1publicly available contract or procurement file maintained by 2the appropriate chief procurement officer. Each disclosure 3under this Section shall be signed and made under penalty of 4perjury by an authorized officer or employee on behalf of the 5bidder, offeror, potential contractor, contractor, or 6subcontractor, and must be filed with the Procurement Policy 7Board and the Commission on Equity and Inclusion. 8    (b) Disclosure shall include any ownership or distributive 9income share that is in excess of 5%, or an amount greater than 1060% of the annual salary of the Governor, of the disclosing 11entity or its parent entity, whichever is less, unless the 12bidder, offeror, potential contractor, contractor, or 13subcontractor (i) is a publicly traded entity subject to 14Federal 10K reporting, in which case it may submit its 10K 15disclosure in place of the prescribed disclosure, or (ii) is a 16privately held entity that is exempt from Federal 10k 17reporting but has more than 100 shareholders, in which case it 18may submit the information that Federal 10k reporting 19companies are required to report under 17 CFR 229.401 and list 20the names of any person or entity holding any ownership share 21that is in excess of 5% in place of the prescribed disclosure. 22The form of disclosure shall be prescribed by the applicable 23chief procurement officer and must include at least the names, 24addresses, and dollar or proportionate share of ownership of 25each person identified in this Section, their instrument of 26ownership or beneficial relationship, and notice of any   SB2298- 3 -LRB104 10185 HLH 20257 b1potential conflict of interest resulting from the current 2ownership or beneficial relationship of each individual 3identified in this Section having in addition any of the 4following relationships:5        (1) State employment, currently or in the previous 3 6    years, including contractual employment of services.7        (2) State employment of spouse, father, mother, son, 8    or daughter, including contractual employment for services 9    in the previous 2 years.10        (3) Elective status; the holding of elective office of 11    the State of Illinois, the government of the United 12    States, any unit of local government authorized by the 13    Constitution of the State of Illinois or the statutes of 14    the State of Illinois currently or in the previous 3 15    years.16        (4) Relationship to anyone holding elective office 17    currently or in the previous 2 years; spouse, father, 18    mother, son, or daughter.19        (5) Appointive office; the holding of any appointive 20    government office of the State of Illinois, the United 21    States of America, or any unit of local government 22    authorized by the Constitution of the State of Illinois or 23    the statutes of the State of Illinois, which office 24    entitles the holder to compensation in excess of expenses 25    incurred in the discharge of that office currently or in 26    the previous 3 years.   SB2298- 4 -LRB104 10185 HLH 20257 b1        (6) Relationship to anyone holding appointive office 2    currently or in the previous 2 years; spouse, father, 3    mother, son, or daughter.4        (7) Employment, currently or in the previous 3 years, 5    as or by any registered lobbyist of the State government.6        (8) Relationship to anyone who is or was a registered 7    lobbyist in the previous 2 years; spouse, father, mother, 8    son, or daughter.9        (9) Compensated employment, currently or in the 10    previous 3 years, by any registered election or 11    re-election committee registered with the Secretary of 12    State or any county clerk in the State of Illinois, or any 13    political action committee registered with either the 14    Secretary of State or the Federal Board of Elections.15        (10) Relationship to anyone; spouse, father, mother, 16    son, or daughter; who is or was a compensated employee in 17    the last 2 years of any registered election or re-election 18    committee registered with the Secretary of State or any 19    county clerk in the State of Illinois, or any political 20    action committee registered with either the Secretary of 21    State or the Federal Board of Elections.22    (b-1) The disclosure required under this Section must also 23include the name and address of each lobbyist required to 24register under the Lobbyist Registration Act and other agent 25of the bidder, offeror, potential contractor, contractor, or 26subcontractor who is not identified under subsections (a) and   SB2298- 5 -LRB104 10185 HLH 20257 b1(b) and who has communicated, is communicating, or may 2communicate with any State officer or employee concerning the 3bid or offer. The disclosure under this subsection is a 4continuing obligation and must be promptly supplemented for 5accuracy throughout the process and throughout the term of the 6contract if the bid or offer is successful.7    (b-2) The disclosure required under this Section must also 8include, for each of the persons identified in subsection (b) 9or (b-1), each of the following that occurred within the 10previous 10 years: suspension or debarment from contracting 11with any governmental entity; professional licensure 12discipline; bankruptcies; adverse civil judgments and 13administrative findings; and criminal felony convictions. The 14disclosure under this subsection is a continuing obligation 15and must be promptly supplemented for accuracy throughout the 16process and throughout the term of the contract if the bid or 17offer is successful. 18    (c) The disclosure in subsection (b) is not intended to 19prohibit or prevent any contract. The disclosure is meant to 20fully and publicly disclose any potential conflict to the 21chief procurement officers, State purchasing officers, their 22designees, and executive officers so they may adequately 23discharge their duty to protect the State.24    (d) When a potential for a conflict of interest is 25identified, discovered, or reasonably suspected, the chief 26procurement officer or State procurement officer shall send   SB2298- 6 -LRB104 10185 HLH 20257 b1the contract to the Procurement Policy Board and the 2Commission on Equity and Inclusion. In accordance with the 3objectives of subsection (c), if the Procurement Policy Board 4or the Commission on Equity and Inclusion finds evidence of a 5potential conflict of interest not originally disclosed by the 6bidder, offeror, potential contractor, contractor, or 7subcontractor, the Board or the Commission on Equity and 8Inclusion shall provide written notice to the bidder, offeror, 9potential contractor, contractor, or subcontractor that is 10identified, discovered, or reasonably suspected of having a 11potential conflict of interest. The bidder, offeror, potential 12contractor, contractor, or subcontractor shall have 15 13calendar days to respond in writing to the Board or the 14Commission on Equity and Inclusion, and a hearing before the 15Board or the Commission on Equity and Inclusion will be 16granted upon request by the bidder, offeror, potential 17contractor, contractor, or subcontractor, at a date and time 18to be determined by the Board or the Commission on Equity and 19Inclusion, but which in no event shall occur later than 15 20calendar days after the date of the request. Upon 21consideration, the Board or the Commission on Equity and 22Inclusion shall recommend, in writing, whether to allow or 23void the contract, bid, offer, or subcontract weighing the 24best interest of the State of Illinois. All recommendations 25shall be submitted to the Executive Ethics Commission. Those 26recommendations made concerning conflicts identified in the   SB2298- 7 -LRB104 10185 HLH 20257 b1course of a procurement for a public institution of higher 2education are, for procurements having a cumulative value 3under $5,000, valid and enforceable, for one calendar year 4after the initial recommendation was made, for all subsequent 5conflicts for that vendor with regard to the same public 6institution of higher education. The Executive Ethics 7Commission must hold a public hearing within 30 calendar days 8after receiving the Board's or the Commission on Equity and 9Inclusion's recommendation if the Procurement Policy Board or 10the Commission on Equity and Inclusion makes a recommendation 11to (i) void a contract or (ii) void a bid or offer and the 12chief procurement officer selected or intends to award the 13contract to the bidder, offeror, or potential contractor. A 14chief procurement officer is prohibited from awarding a 15contract before a hearing if the Board or the Commission on 16Equity and Inclusion recommendation does not support a bid or 17offer. The recommendation and proceedings of any hearing, if 18applicable, shall be available to the public. 19    (e) These thresholds and disclosure do not relieve the 20chief procurement officer, the State purchasing officer, or 21their designees from reasonable care and diligence for any 22contract, bid, offer, or submission to a vendor portal. The 23chief procurement officer, the State purchasing officer, or 24their designees shall be responsible for using any reasonably 25known and publicly available information to discover any 26undisclosed potential conflict of interest and act to protect   SB2298- 8 -LRB104 10185 HLH 20257 b1the best interest of the State of Illinois.2    (f) Inadvertent or accidental failure to fully disclose 3shall render the contract, bid, offer, proposal, subcontract, 4or relationship voidable by the chief procurement officer if 5he or she deems it in the best interest of the State of 6Illinois and, at his or her discretion, may be cause for 7barring from future contracts, bids, offers, proposals, 8subcontracts, or relationships with the State for a period of 9up to 2 years.10    (g) Intentional, willful, or material failure to disclose 11shall render the contract, bid, offer, proposal, subcontract, 12or relationship voidable by the chief procurement officer if 13he or she deems it in the best interest of the State of 14Illinois and shall result in debarment from future contracts, 15bids, offers, proposals, subcontracts, or relationships for a 16period of not less than 2 years and not more than 10 years. 17Reinstatement after 2 years and before 10 years must be 18reviewed and commented on in writing by the Governor of the 19State of Illinois, or by an executive ethics board or 20commission he or she might designate. The comment shall be 21returned to the responsible chief procurement officer who must 22rule in writing whether and when to reinstate.23    (h) In addition, all disclosures shall note any other 24current or pending contracts, bids, offers, proposals, 25subcontracts, leases, or other ongoing procurement 26relationships the bidder, offeror, potential contractor,   SB2298- 9 -LRB104 10185 HLH 20257 b1contractor, or subcontractor has with any other unit of State 2government and shall clearly identify the unit and the 3contract, offer, proposal, lease, or other relationship.4    (i) The bidder, offeror, potential contractor, or 5contractor has a continuing obligation to supplement the 6disclosure required by this Section throughout the bidding 7process during the term of any contract, and during the vendor 8portal registration process. 9    (j) If a bid or offer is received from a responsive bidder, 10offeror, vendor, contractor, or subcontractor with an annual 11value of more than $100,000 and the bidder, offeror, vendor, 12contractor, or subcontractor has an active contract with that 13same entity and already has submitted their financial 14disclosures and potential conflicts of interest within the 15last 12 months, the bidder, offeror, vendor, contractor, or 16subcontractor may submit a signed affidavit attesting that the 17original submission of its financial disclosures and potential 18conflicts of interests has not been altered or changed. The 19form and content of the affidavit shall be prescribed by the 20applicable chief procurement officer. 21(Source: P.A. 101-657, eff. 1-1-22; 102-721, eff. 1-1-23; 22102-1119, eff. 1-23-23.)